Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-671
City or village; levy a tax; when; limitation.

Any city or village of the state which makes any contributions or payments required to be made by the Employment Security Law shall levy a tax in order to defray the cost to such city or village in meeting the obligations arising by reason of such law. Such tax shall be in excess of and in addition to all other taxes now or hereafter authorized to be levied by such city. The revenue so raised shall be limited to the amount needed to defray the cost to such city or village in meeting the obligations arising by reason of the Employment Security Law and shall be used for no other purpose.

Laws 1977, LB 509, § 11;

Laws 1985, LB 339, § 53.